Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226.14
Flood protection and water quality enhancement bonds; authority to issue; termination.

The authority to issue bonds for qualified projects granted in section 2-3226.10 terminates on December 31, 2024, except that (1) any bonds already issued and outstanding for qualified projects as of such date are permitted to remain outstanding and the district shall retain all powers of taxation provided for in section 2-3226.10 to provide for the payment of principal and interest on such bonds and (2) refunding bonds may continue to be issued and outstanding as of December 31, 2024, including extension of principal maturities if determined appropriate.

Laws 2009, LB160, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB177, § 1.